Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-255
Court-ordered meeting.

(MBCA 7.03) (a) The district
court of the county where a corporation's principal office, or, if none in
this state, its registered office, is located may summarily order a meeting
to be held:

(1) On application of any
shareholder of the corporation entitled to participate in an annual meeting
if an annual meeting was not held or action by written consent in lieu thereof
did not become effective within the earlier of six months after the end of
the corporation's fiscal year or fifteen months after its last annual meeting;
or

(2)
On application of a shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting
valid under section 21-254, if:

(i) Notice of the special meeting was not given within
thirty days after the date the demand was delivered to the corporation's secretary;
or

(ii)
The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

(b) The court may fix the
time and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate
in the meeting, specify a record date or dates for determining shareholders
entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content
of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be
considered at the meeting or direct that the votes represented at the meeting
constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other orders necessary
to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 55.
January 1, 2016